test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kaitse
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kaitses
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: kaitsesid
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: kaitsesite
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: kaitsesime
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: kaitsesid
     kaitsma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: kaitsesin
     kastma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: kastma
     kastma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: kastmast
     kastma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: kastmas
     kastma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: kastmaks
     kastma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: kastmata
     kastma+V+Pers+Quot: kastvat
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: kastsid
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: kastsite
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: kastsime
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: kastsid
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: kastsin
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: kastnuvat
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: kastnud
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kastnud
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: kastnuks
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: kastnuksid
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: kastnuksite
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: kastnuksime
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: kastnuksid
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: kastnuksin
     kastma+V+Inf: kasta
     kastma+V+Ger: kastes
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: kastku
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: kastke
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: kastkem
     kastma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: kastetud
     kastma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kastetud
     kastma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: kastetuks
     kastma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: kastetav
     kastma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: kastetavat
     kastma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: kastetaks
     kastma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kasteta
     kastma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: kastetakse
     kastma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: kastetagu
     kastma+V+Impers+Sup: kastetama
     kastma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: kasteti
     kastma+V+Pers+Prc: kastev
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: kastad
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: kastaks
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: kastaksid
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: kastaksite
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: kastaksime
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: kastaksid
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: kastaksin
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: kastan
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: kastame
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: kastate
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: kastavad
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kastab
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: kasta
     kastma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kasta
     kastma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kastis
     katma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: katma
     katma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: katmast
     katma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: katmas
     katma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: katmaks
     katma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: katmata
     katma+V+Pers+Quot: katvat
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: katsid
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: katsite
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: katsime
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: katsid
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: katsin
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: katku
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: katke
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: katkem
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: katnuvat
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: katnud
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: katnud
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: katnuks
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: katnuksid
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: katnuksite
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: katnuksime
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: katnuksid
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: katnuksin
     katma+V+Inf: katta
     katma+V+Ger: kattes
     katma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kattis
     katma+V+Pers+Prc: kattev
     katkuma+V+Inf: katkuda
     katkuma+V+Ger: katkudes
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: katkutud
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: katkutud
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: katkutuks
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: katkutav
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: katkutavat
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: katkutaks
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: katkuta
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: katkutakse
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: katkutagu
     katkuma+V+Impers+Sup: katkutama
     katkuma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: katkuti
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: katkus
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: katkusid
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: katkusite
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: katkusime
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: katkusid
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: katkusin
     katkuma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: katkuma
     katkuma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: katkumast
     katkuma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: katkumas
     katkuma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: katkumaks
     katkuma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: katkumata
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prc: katkuv
     katkuma+V+Pers+Quot: katkuvat
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: katkud
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: katkuks
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: katkuksid
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: katkuksite
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: katkuksime
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: katkuksid
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: katkuksin
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: katkun
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: katkume
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: katkute
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: katkuvad
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: katkub
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: katku
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: katku
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: katkunuvat
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: katkunud
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: katkunud
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: katkunuks
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: katkunuksid
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: katkunuksite
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: katkunuksime
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: katkunuksid
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: katkunuksin
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: katkugu
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: katkuge
     katkuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: katkugem
     katma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: kaetud
     katma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kaetud
     katma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: kaetuks
     katma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: kaetav
     katma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: kaetavat
     katma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: kaetaks
     katma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kaeta
     katma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: kaetakse
     katma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: kaetagu
     katma+V+Impers+Sup: kaetama
     katma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: kaeti
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: katad
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: kataks
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: kataksid
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: kataksite
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: kataksime
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: kataksid
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: kataksin
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: katan
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: katame
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: katate
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: katavad
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: katab
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: kata
     katma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kata
     keema+V+Inf: keeda
     keema+V+Ger: keedes
     keema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: keedud
     keema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: keedud
     keema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: keeduks
     keema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: keedav
     keema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: keedavat
     keema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: keedaks
     keema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: keeda
     keema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: keedakse
     keema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: keedagu
     keema+V+Impers+Sup: keedama
     keema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: keedi
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kees
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: keesid
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: keesite
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: keesime
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: keesid
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: keesin
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: keegu
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: keege
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: keegem
     keema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: keema
     keema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: keemast
     keema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: keemas
     keema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: keemaks
     keema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: keemata
     keema+V+Pers+Prc: keev
     keema+V+Pers+Quot: keevat
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: keed
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: keeks
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: keeksid
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: keeksite
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: keeksime
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: keeksid
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: keeksin
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: keen
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: keeme
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: keete
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: keevad
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: keeb
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: kee
     keema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kee
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: keenuvat
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: keenud
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: keenud
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: keenuks
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: keenuksid
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: keenuksite
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: keenuksime
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: keenuksid
     keema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: keenuksin
     kuulma+V+Inf: kuulda
     kuulma+V+Ger: kuuldes
     kuulma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: kuulma
     kuulma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: kuulmast
     kuulma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: kuulmas
     kuulma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: kuulmaks
     kuulma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: kuulmata
     kuulma+V+Pers+Quot: kuulvat
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: kuulsid
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: kuulsite
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: kuulsime
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: kuulsid
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: kuulsin
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: kuulnuvat
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: kuulnud
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kuulnud
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: kuulnuks
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: kuulnuksid
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: kuulnuksite
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: kuulnuksime
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: kuulnuksid
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: kuulnuksin
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: kuulgu
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: kuulge
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: kuulgem
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: kuuldud
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kuuldud
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: kuulduks
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: kuuldav
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: kuuldavat
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: kuuldaks
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kuulda
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: kuuldakse
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: kuuldagu
     kuulma+V+Impers+Sup: kuuldama
     kuulma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: kuuldi
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prc: kuulev
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: kuuled
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: kuuleks
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: kuuleksid
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: kuuleksite
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: kuuleksime
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: kuuleksid
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: kuuleksin
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: kuulen
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: kuuleme
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: kuulete
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: kuulevad
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kuuleb
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: kuule
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kuule
     kuulma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kuulis
     kusema+V+Inf: kusta
     kusema+V+Ger: kustes
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: kusid
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: kusite
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: kusime
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: kusid
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: kusin
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: kusnuvat
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: kusnud
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kusnud
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: kusnuks
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: kusnuksid
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: kusnuksite
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: kusnuksime
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: kusnuksid
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: kusnuksin
     kusema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: kusku
     kusema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: kuske
     kusema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: kuskem
     kusema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: kusi
     kusema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: kustud
     kusema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: kustud
     kusema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: kustuks
     kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: kustav
     kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: kustavat
     kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: kustaks
     kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: kusta
     kusema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: kustakse
